VariableN.lexc
!Complete Template for Variable Nouns. There are 2 sizes, 2 numbers, and 2 forms of optional possession = 12 forms total

Multichar_Symbols
!=========!
!==VERBS==!
!=========!

!Flags for verbs
@U.TV.NO@
@U.TV.YES@
@U.NOM.YES@
@U.NOM.NO@
@U.COMP.YES@
@U.COMP.NO@
@U.Pref.YES@
@U.ActIV.YES@
@U.ActIV.NO@
@U.Pref.YES@
@U.Pref.NO@

!=Agreement for verbs=!
!SETA
-1sg.comp -2sg.comp -3sg.comp -1pl.comp -2pl.comp -3pl.comp
-n' -ka' -y' -k -ka'% ay -y'% ay% %(lhik%)

!SETB for nouns and verbs
1sg 2sg 3sg 1pl 2pl 3pl
ɨn- ka'- mu- muk- ka(ay)- mu(ay)-

!SetB Functions
.subj .poss

!SetC and D
1sg- 2sg- 3sg- 1pl- 2pl- 3pl-
!SetC (all of SetB except for 3sg and 3pl forms)
%0- %0(ay)-
!SetD (add of SetB except for 3sg and 3pl forms)
a- a(ay)-

!Aspect for verbs
.comp .incomp .vn

!IVClassmarkers
-act -aff
-lha' -'

!Ghost Tags for IVs
%{NC%} %{AFF%}

!=========!
!==Nouns==!
!=========!
!Flags for Nouns
@U.ALIEN.YES@
@U.ALIEN.NO@

!SetE = similar to Set A except 3sg and 3pl forms
-1sg.poss -2sg.poss -3sg.poss -1pl.poss -2pl.poss -2pl.poss
-h -h% lhik

!Orthographic symbols
ch
ch'
ts'
l'
k'
p'
t'
w'
r'
n'
m'
y'

LEXICON Root
    Nouns ;

LEXICON Nouns
    Diminutive ;
!@U.ALIEN.YES@ Alienable ;
!@U.ALIEN.NO@ Ialienable ;
    Variable ;

LEXICON Diminutive
!@U.ALIEN.YES@dim-:@U.ALIEN.YES@chu- Alienable ;
!@U.ALIEN.YES@dim-:@U.ALIEN.YES@chu- Inalienable ;
dim-:chu-   Variable ;

LEXICON Variable
    SetB ;
    VNstems ;

LEXICON SetB ! possession for all verbal nouns and alienable nouns and tv incompletive
! @U.Pref.YES@1sg:@U.Pref.YES@ɨn- SetBFunction ;
! @U.Pref.YES@2sg:@U.Pref.YES@ka'- SetBFunction ;
@U.Pref.YES@3sg:@U.Pref.YES@mu- SetBFunction ;
! @U.Pref.YES@1pl:@U.Pref.YES@muk- SetBFunction ;
! @U.Pref.YES@2pl:@U.Pref.YES@ka(ay)- SetBFunction ;
! @U.Pref.YES@3pl:@U.Pref.YES@mu(ay)- SetBFunction ;

LEXICON SetBFunction
@U.NOM.NO@.subj-:@U.NOM.NO@ TVstems ; ! TV incompletive
@U.NOM.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@0 TVstems ; !TV Verbal nouns
@U.NOM.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@0 IVclass ; ! IV Verbal nouns
@U.NOM.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@0 ANsubclasses ; ! Alienable nouns
@U.NOM.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@0 VNstems ; ! Variable nouns

LEXICON VNstems 
mɨn'a Number ;

LEXICON Number
.sg:0 SetE ;
-pl:-lh%{F%} SetE ;

LEXICON SetE
! @U.ALIEN.NO@-1sg.poss:@U.ALIEN.NO@-n' # ;
! @U.ALIEN.NO@-2sg.poss:@U.ALIEN.NO@-ka' # ;
@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-3sg.poss:@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-h # ;
! @U.ALIEN.NO@-1pl.poss:@U.ALIEN.NO@-k # ;
! @U.ALIEN.NO@-2pl.poss:@U.ALIEN.NO@-ka% ay # ;
! @U.ALIEN.NO@-3pl.poss:@U.ALIEN.NO@-h% lhik # ;
# ;
